Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; RETHOS.new text end new text begin $680,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $680,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Rethos, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, for the following activities related to expanding the Main Street America - Minnesota program: outreach, engagement, training, education, reporting, program evaluation, and reducing financial barriers to program participation. Of this amount, $230,000 must be made available to participating local Main Street America organizations in the form of technical assistance grants, using criteria and processes developed by Rethos. new text end